test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pierz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pierz: # Noun 114 'eng /est perse/fin' - full paradigm
     pierz+N+Sg+Nom: pierz
     pierz+N+Sg+Gen: pierz
     pierz+N+Sg+Par: pīerzta
     pierz+N+Sg+Dat: pierzõn
     pierz+N+Sg+Ins: pierzkõks
     pierz+N+Sg+Ill: pierzgõ
     pierz+N+Sg+Ela: piergõst
     pierz+N+Pl+Nom: pīerzõd
     pierz+N+Pl+Gen: pīerzõd
     pierz+N+Pl+Par: pīerzidi
     pierz+N+Pl+Dat: pīerzõdõn
     pierz+N+Pl+Ins: pīerzõdõks
     pierz+N+Pl+Ill: pīerziž
     pierz+N+Pl+Ela: pīerzist
